Utah statutes.
26-23-4.   Unlawful acts by department officers and employees.

It shall be unlawful for any officer or employee of the department:

(1)  To accept any gift, remuneration, or other consideration, directly or indirectly, for an incorrect or improper performance of the duties imposed upon him by or in behalf of the department or by the provisions of this chapter.

(2)  To perform any work, labor, or services other than the duties assigned to him on behalf of the department during the hours such officer or employee is regularly employed by the department, or to perform his duties as an officer or employee of the department under any condition or arrangement that involves a violation of this or any other law of the state.

